Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1410
Municipality; state; agreement; provisions.

Any agreement entered into between the state and a municipality pursuant to the provisions of sections 72-1401 to 72-1408 may provide for the following:

(1) The subleasing by the State of Nebraska to any public body corporate or political subdivision of the State of Nebraska of a portion of the space in the building or other facility with respect to which the agreement has been made; and

(2) The leasing by such municipality to any public body corporate or political subdivision of the State of Nebraska of a portion of the space in the building or other facility with respect to which the agreement has been made.

Laws 1974, LB 945, § 2.